North Dakota statutes. TITLE 29 Judicial Procedure, Criminal
CHAPTER 29-23 Proceedings after Verdict and Before Judgment

29-23-01.
Statement of the case — How constituted. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rules 10, 28.

29-23-02.
Statement of case — Its office — What need not be embodied. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rules 10, 28.

29-23-03.
Statement of the case — By whom settled. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rules 10, 28.

29-23-04.
Statement of the case — Filing thereof — Made part of record. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rules 10, 28.

29-23-05.
Matters deemed excepted to. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 51.

29-23-06.
Instructions excepted to part of record. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 30, 51.

29-23-07.
Clerk to enter orders — Certified copies.

The clerk of the district court in which any criminal action or proceeding is pending or tried shall enter, in the minutes of such court, each ruling or decision of the court made in open court, if such ruling is not noted by the official reporter. A certified copy of any or all such entries must be and become a part of the record of said action.

Source:

R.C. 1895, § 8261; R.C. 1899, § 8261; R.C. 1905, § 10070; C.L. 1913, § 10907; R.C. 1943, § 29-2307.

29-23-08.
When supreme court may settle statement. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rules 10, 28.

29-23-09.
Time may be extended. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rules 10, 28.

29-23-10.
Title construed.

Nothing in this title contained is to be construed so as to deprive either party of the right to take advantage of any action or decision of the court in a criminal action or proceeding which affects any other material or substantial right of either party, whether before or after the trial, or on such trial.

Source:

R.C. 1895, § 8263; R.C. 1899, § 8263; R.C. 1905, § 10072; C.L. 1913, § 10909; R.C. 1943, § 29-2310.

29-23-11.
An error in record basis of motion for new trial or appeal.

Any error committed by the court in or by any decision, ruling, instruction, or other act, and appearing in the record of the action, may be taken advantage of upon a motion for a new trial or in the supreme court on an appeal.

Source:

R.C. 1895, § 8269; R.C. 1899, § 8269; R.C. 1905, § 10078; C.L. 1913, § 10915; R.C. 1943, § 29-2311.